Utah statutes.
72-5-401.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Corridor" means the path or proposed path of a transportation facility that exists or that may exist in the future.  A corridor may include the land occupied or to be occupied by a transportation facility, and any other land that may be needed for expanding a transportation facility or for controlling access to it.

(2)  "Corridor preservation" means planning or acquisition processes intended to:

(a)  protect or enhance the capacity of existing corridors; and

(b)  protect the availability of proposed corridors in advance of the need for and the actual commencement of the transportation facility construction.

(3)  "Development" means:

(a)  the subdividing of land;

(b)  the construction of improvements, expansions, or additions; or

(c)  any other action that will appreciably increase the value of and the future acquisition cost of land.

(4)  "Official map" means a map, drawn by government authorities and recorded in county recording offices that:

(a)  shows actual and proposed rights-of-way, centerline alignments, and setbacks for highways and other transportation facilities;

(b)  provides a basis for restricting development in designated rights-of-way or between designated setbacks to allow the government authorities time to purchase or otherwise reserve the land; and

(c)  for counties and municipalities may be adopted as an element of the general plan, pursuant to Title 17, Chapter 27a, Part 4, General Plan, or Title 10, Chapter 9a, Part 4, General Plan.

(5)  "Taking" means an act or regulation, either by exercise of eminent domain or other police power, whereby government puts private property to public use or restrains use of private property for public purposes, and that requires compensation to be paid to private property owners.



Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

